Missouri, session 2026, SB1726.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 455.010, 455.035, and 455.513, RSMo,
are repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to
be known as sections 455.010, 455.035, and 455.513, to read as
follows:
455.010. As used in this chapter, unless the context
clearly indicates otherwise, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Abuse", includes but is not limited to the
occurrence of any of the following acts, attempts or threats
against a person who may be protected pursuant to this
chapter, except abuse shall not include abuse inflicted on a
child by accidental means by an adult household member or
discipline of a child, including spanking, in a reasonable
manner:
(a) "Abusing a pet", purposely or knowingly causing,
attempting to cause, or threatening to cause physical injury
to a pet with the intent to control, punish, intimidate, or
distress the petitioner;
(b) "Assault", purposely or knowingly placing or
attempting to place another in fear of physical harm;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1726 2
(c) "Battery", purposely or knowingly causing physical
harm to another with or without a deadly weapon;
(d) "Coercion", compelling another by force or threat
of force to engage in conduct from which the latter has a
right to abstain or to abstain from conduct in which the
person has a right to engage;
(e) "Harassment", engaging in a purposeful or knowing
course of conduct involving more than one incident that
alarms or causes distress to an adult or child and serves no
legitimate purpose. The course of conduct must be such as
would cause a reasonable adult or child to suffer
substantial emotional distress and must actually cause
substantial emotional distress to the petitioner or child.
Such conduct might include, but is not limited to:
a. Following another about in a public place or places;
b. Peering in the window or lingering outside the
residence of another; but does not include constitutionally
protected activity;
(f) "Sexual assault", causing or attempting to cause
another to engage involuntarily in any sexual act by force,
threat of force, duress, or without that person's consent;
(g) "Unlawful imprisonment", holding, confining,
detaining or abducting another person against that person's
will;
(2) "Adult", any person [seventeen] eighteen years of
age or older or otherwise emancipated;
(3) "Child", any person under [seventeen] eighteen
years of age unless otherwise emancipated;
(4) "Court", the circuit or associate circuit judge or
a family court commissioner;

SB 1726 3
(5) "Domestic violence", abuse or stalking committed
by a family or household member, as such terms are defined
in this section;
(6) "Ex parte order of protection", an order of
protection issued by the court before the respondent has
received notice of the petition or an opportunity to be
heard on it;
(7) "Family" or "household member", spouses, former
spouses, any person related by blood or marriage, persons
who are presently residing together or have resided together
in the past, any person who is or has been in a continuing
social relationship of a romantic or intimate nature with
the victim, and anyone who has a child in common regardless
of whether they have been married or have resided together
at any time;
(8) "Full order of protection", an order of protection
issued after a hearing on the record where the respondent
has received notice of the proceedings and has had an
opportunity to be heard;
(9) "Order of protection", either an ex parte order of
protection or a full order of protection;
(10) "Pending", exists or for which a hearing date has
been set;
(11) "Pet", a living creature maintained by a
household member for companionship and not for commercial
purposes;
(12) "Petitioner", a family or household member who
has been a victim of domestic violence, or any person who
has been the victim of stalking or sexual assault, or a
person filing on behalf of a child pursuant to section
455.503 who has filed a verified petition pursuant to the
provisions of section 455.020 or section 455.505;

SB 1726 4
(13) "Respondent", the family or household member
alleged to have committed an act of domestic violence, or
person alleged to have committed an act of stalking or
sexual assault, against whom a verified petition has been
filed or a person served on behalf of a child pursuant to
section 455.503;
(14) "Sexual assault", as defined under subdivision
(1) of this section;
(15) "Stalking", is when any person purposely engages
in an unwanted course of conduct that causes alarm to
another person, or a person who resides together in the same
household with the person seeking the order of protection
when it is reasonable in that person's situation to have
been alarmed by the conduct. As used in this subdivision:
(a) "Alarm", to cause fear of danger of physical harm;
and
(b) "Course of conduct", two or more acts that serve
no legitimate purpose including, but not limited to, acts in
which the stalker directly, indirectly, or through a third
party follows, monitors, observes, surveils, threatens, or
communicates to a person by any action, method, or device.
455.035. 1. Upon the filing of a verified petition
pursuant to sections 455.010 to 455.085 and for good cause
shown in the petition, the court may immediately issue an ex
parte order of protection. An immediate and present danger
of domestic violence to the petitioner or the child on whose
behalf the petition is filed shall constitute good cause for
purposes of this section. An ex parte order of protection
entered by the court shall take effect when entered and
shall remain in effect until there is valid service of
process and a hearing is held on the motion. The court
shall deny the ex parte order and dismiss the petition if

SB 1726 5
the petitioner is not authorized to seek relief pursuant to
section 455.020.
2. Failure to serve an ex parte order of protection on
the respondent shall not affect the validity or
enforceability of such order. If the respondent is less
than [seventeen] eighteen years of age, unless otherwise
emancipated, service of process shall be made upon a
custodial parent or guardian of the respondent, or upon a
guardian ad litem appointed by the court, requiring that the
person appear and bring the respondent before the court at
the time and place stated.
3. If an ex parte order is entered and the respondent
is less than [seventeen] eighteen years of age, the court
shall transfer the case to juvenile court for a hearing on a
full order of protection. The court shall appoint a
guardian ad litem for any such respondent not represented by
a parent or guardian.
455.513. 1. The court may immediately issue an ex
parte order of protection upon the filing of a verified
petition under sections 455.500 to 455.538, for good cause
shown in the petition, and upon finding that:
(1) No prior order regarding custody involving the
respondent and the child is pending or has been made; or
(2) The respondent is less than [seventeen] eighteen
years of age.
An immediate and present danger of domestic violence,
including danger to the child's pet, stalking, or sexual
assault to a child shall constitute good cause for purposes
of this section. An ex parte order of protection entered by
the court shall be in effect until the time of the hearing.
The court shall deny the ex parte order and dismiss the

SB 1726 6
petition if the petitioner is not authorized to seek relief
pursuant to section 455.505.
2. Upon the entry of the ex parte order of protection,
the court shall enter its order appointing a guardian ad
litem or court-appointed special advocate to represent the
child victim.
3. If the allegations in the petition would give rise
to jurisdiction under section 211.031, the court may direct
the children's division to conduct an investigation and to
provide appropriate services. The division shall submit a
written investigative report to the court and to the
juvenile officer within thirty days of being ordered to do
so. The report shall be made available to the parties and
the guardian ad litem or court-appointed special advocate.
4. If the allegations in the petition would give rise
to jurisdiction under section 211.031 because the respondent
is less than [seventeen] eighteen years of age, the court
may issue an ex parte order and shall transfer the case to
juvenile court for a hearing on a full order of protection.
Service of process shall be made pursuant to section 455.035.
✓